Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1859.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299C.80, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Reporting. new text begin (a) new text end As provided for in chapter 13, the superintendent must make all new text begin of the following new text end inactive investigative data for officer-involved death investigations that are public under section 13.82, subdivision 7, or other applicable law available on the bureau's website within 30 days deleted text begin of the end of the last criminal appeal of a subject of an investigation.deleted text end new text begin of the case becoming inactive as defined by 13.82, subdivision 7:new text end new text begin (1) reports, audio, and photographs; and new text end new text begin (2) any video that records, describes, or otherwise documents actions and circumstances surrounding the officer-involved death. new text end new text begin (b) new text end By February 1 of each year, the superintendent shall report to the commissioner, the governor, and the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over public safety finance and policy the following information about the unit: the number of investigations initiated; the number of incidents investigated; the outcomes or current status of each investigation; the charging decisions made by the prosecuting authority of incidents investigated by the unit; the number of plea agreements reached in incidents investigated by the unit; and any other information relevant to the unit's mission.